Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 18.1 Probation and Parole Support Act

12-18.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Probation and Parole Support Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 9, § 1.

12-18.1-2.
Repealed.

12-18.1-3.
Court costs.

The court shall assess as court costs, in addition to those otherwise provided by law, against all defendants charged with a felony, misdemeanor, or petty misdemeanor, and who plead nolo contendere or guilty or who are found guilty of the commission of those crimes, as follows:

Where the offense charged is a felony and carries a maximum penalty of five (5) or more years imprisonment, three hundred dollars ($300) or ten percent (10%) of any fine imposed on the defendant by the court, whichever is greater;

Where the offense charged is a felony and carries a maximum penalty of less than five (5) years imprisonment, one hundred eighty dollars ($180) or ten percent (10%) of any fine imposed on the defendant by the court, whichever is greater; and

Where the offense charged is a misdemeanor, sixty dollars ($60.00) or ten percent (10%) of any fine imposed on the defendant by the court, whichever is greater.

These court costs shall not be assessed when the defendant is sentenced to prison for thirty (30) days or more on any count, multiple counts, or multiple charges and shall be remitted if a defendant subsequently serves thirty (30) days or more on a violation.

When there are multiple counts or multiple charges to be disposed of simultaneously, the judge shall have the authority to suspend the obligation of the defendant to pay on all counts or charges above one.

If a defendant is indigent, or demonstrates a limited or inability to pay, in accordance with the standards and procedures contained in §§

12-20-10

and

12-21-20

, the court costs contemplated by this section may be waived or reduced.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 40, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 297, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 326, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 200, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 201, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

12-18.1-4.
Deposit of and use of proceeds.

All revenues collected under §

12-18.1-3

shall be deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 41.

12-18.1-5.
Report to governor and general assembly.

Pursuant to §

12-18.1-4

there shall be annually transmitted to the governor and general assembly a report setting forth the amount of money in the fund at the beginning of each year, the amount collected during the year, and the total of money disbursed from the fund during the year.

The annual report required by this section shall be filed by March 1 of each year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 60, § 1.